District of Columbia statutes.
42-2703.04

Repealed

Loans to mortgage lenders; requirements for reinvestment of proceeds by lender.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-135, § 304, 25 DCR 5008
Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-28, § 2(o), 28 DCR 2848
June 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-118, § 7, 39 DCR 3189
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 49, 43 DCR 530
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 1101, 44 DCR 7378
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-247, § 2(k), 46 DCR 1100
1981 Ed., § 45-2124.
1973 Ed., § 45-1911.